Illinois, session 104th, HB4005.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Officials and Employees Ethics Act is 5amended by adding Section 5-10.7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 430/5-10.7 new)7    Sec. 5-10.7. Law enforcement training program. Each member 8shall, on an annual basis, participate in a law enforcement 9educational program, which shall include, but shall not be 10limited to, a ride-along program and a simulation training 11program, as organized by a county sheriff's department of that 12member's legislative district or representative district.